Maryland, session 2026, SB0123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1409.
(a) There is an Oversight Committee on Quality of Care in Nursing Homes and
Assisted Living Facilities.
(b) The Oversight Committee shall consist of the following members:
(1) One member of the Senate Finance Committee, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
(2) [One member of the Senate Education, Health, and Environmental
Affairs Committee, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(3) Two members] ONE MEMBER of the House Health and Government
Operations Committee, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
– 1 –

Ch. 62 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(4)] (3) The Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(5)] (4) The Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(6)] (5) The Director of the Office of Health Care Quality, or the
Director’s designee;
[(7)] (6) The Deputy Secretary for Behavioral Health, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;
[(8)] (7) The Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(9)] (8) The Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(10)] (9) The State Long–Term Care Ombudsman;
[(11)] (10) Two representatives of area agencies on aging, one of which shall
be a member of a local long–term care ombudsman program established under Title 10,
Subtitle 9 of the Human Services Article, selected by the President of the Maryland
Association of Area Agencies on Aging;
[(12)] (11) One representative of a local long–term care ombudsman entity,
selected by the State Long–Term Care Ombudsman;
[(13)] (12) Three consumer members, selected by the State Long–Term
Care Ombudsman, all of whom shall be consumers living in an assisted living facility or a
nursing home or have a family member living in an assisted living facility or a nursing
home;
[(14)] (13) The following representatives, selected by the organizations the
individual represents:
(i) One representative from the Health Facilities Association of
Maryland;
(ii) (I) One representative from the Mid–Atlantic LifeSpan;
(iii) (II) One representative of the Hospice Network of Maryland;
(iv) (III) One representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
(v) (IV) One representative of 1199SEIU United Health Workers
East;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 62
(vi) (V) One representative of the Maryland Chapter of AARP;
(vii) (VI) One representative of United Seniors of Maryland;
(viii) One representative of Voices for Quality Care;
(ix) (VII) One representative of the Mental Health Association of
Maryland knowledgeable in issues of aging;
(x) (VIII) One representative of the Greater Maryland Chapter of
the Alzheimer’s Association; and
(xi) (IX) One representative of the Maryland Association of FOR
MEDICAL Adult Day Services; and
(X) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF LEADINGAGE MARYLAND; AND
[(15)] (14) Three representatives from the assisted living industry, of
which, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, one shall represent a program that cares for one
to four residents, one shall represent a program that cares for five to nine residents, and
one shall represent a program that cares for more than 10 residents.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –